Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
138

ENHANCED
911 SERVICES

Section

138-1 Definitions

138-2 Enhanced 911 board

138-3 Enhanced 911 fund

138-4 Surcharge

138-5 Disbursements from the fund

138-6 Report to the legislature

138-7 Audits

138-8 Proprietary information

138-9 Limitation of liability

138-10 Database or location information

138-11 Dispute resolution

138-12 Service contracts

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next